Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-306
Alcohol or drug dependence, defined.

Alcohol or drug dependence means cognitive, behavioral, and psychological symptoms indicating the continued use of alcohol or other drugs despite significant alcohol or drug-related problems.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 157.